Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5663YH (2) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2613 Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. Compile the information submitted 3 pursuant to section 257.11B, subsections 12 and 13, and 4 submit an annual report to the general assembly not later than 5 September 1. The report shall include all of the following: 6 a. The total amount of education savings account funds 7 distributed during the preceding fiscal year. 8 b. The total amount of such funds received by accredited 9 nonpublic schools. 10 c. Expenditure information as reported pursuant to section 11 257.11B, subsection 12. 12 d. Information regarding approved applicants who declined 13 participation in the program, and pupils who withdrew from an 14 accredited nonpublic school, including the reasoning for such 15 withdrawal, as reported pursuant to section 257.11B, subsection 16 13. 17 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsections: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. a. An accredited nonpublic school that 20 accepts payment from a parent or guardian using funds from a 21 pupilâs account in the education savings account fund shall 22 annually report to the department of education, at a time and 23 in a manner prescribed by the department, all of the following: 24 (1) The total amount of education savings account funds 25 received by the school during the preceding fiscal year. 26 (2) A list of the expenditures of such funds, including 27 expenditures for salaries and infrastructure. 28 b. An accredited nonpublic school that accepts payment from 29 a parent or guardian using funds from a pupilâs account in the 30 education savings account fund shall prepare and publish an 31 annual budget in the same manner as a school district pursuant 32 to section 24.9. The budget shall clearly identify the amount 33 of education savings account funds received and the purposes 34 for which such funds are allocated. 35 -1- LSB 5663YH (2) 91 mb/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2613 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. A parent or guardian who applies for 1 participation in the education savings account program and is 2 approved but declines to use the account, or who withdraws a 3 pupil from an accredited nonpublic school for which education 4 savings account funds were approved, shall report to the 5 department of education, at a time and in a manner prescribed 6 by the department, the reason for declining participation or 7 withdrawal. 8